Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5080.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 241.27, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1b. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin "Private business" means all entities organized under the laws of this state or a foreign jurisdiction, but does not include governmental units. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 241.27, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Reports and financial statements. new text begin (a) new text end MINNCOR shall include its full costs for inmate wages and the money it receives from the department for inmate confinement costs in its annual financial statements and reports. In addition, MINNCOR shall disclose in its annual reportnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end how the money it receives from the department for inmate confinement costs affects its profitabilitynew text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (2) a calculation of the profitability of each contract MINNCOR has with private businesses consistent with the requirements set forth in subdivision 7, paragraph (a)new text end . new text begin (b) MINNCOR must post on the agency's public-facing website the Prison Industry Enhancement Certification Program wage for each region of the state where MINNCOR is contracting with a private business. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 241.27, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Interactions with private businesses. new text begin (a) MINNCOR must participate in the United States Bureau of Justice Assistance's Prison Industry Enhancement Certification Program (PIECP). When implementing the PIECP, MINNCOR must: new text end new text begin (1) calculate the PIECP wage which is the prevailing wage rate for each region of the state where MINNCOR is contracting with a private business based on the Department of Employment and Economic Development's wage survey and set the rate at the 50th percentile for each region; new text end new text begin (2) separately track wages paid to inmates at either the PIECP wage or the non-PIECP wage which is a wage rate that is exempt from the PIECP's prevailing wage requirement; new text end new text begin (3) not use a blended wage rate that combines PIECP wages and non-PIECP wages when assessing and evaluating contract costs, profitability, and potential partnerships with private businesses; and new text end new text begin (4) classify and document each inmate's MINNCOR position as either a PIECP wage position or a non-PIECP wage position. new text end new text begin (b) MINNCOR must not subsidize private businesses, including but not limited to using the costs of confinement to offset contract costs, to manipulate a contract's profitability calculation, or to otherwise reduce a private business' operating expenses. new text end new text begin (c) MINNCOR must account for all labor, manufacturing, general, and administrative costs when establishing standard contract rates. new text end new text begin (d) MINNCOR must recapture the fair market value for use of Department of Corrections floor space and storage that is dedicated to a private business. new text end new text begin (e) When entering into a contract and calculating labor costs, MINNCOR must use the prevailing wage rate for the industry in which the inmates are working as determined by the Department of Employment and Economic Development. new text end new text begin (f) MINNCOR must not enter a contract with a private business if inmate labor will provide more than 70 percent of the business' full-time equivalent employee head count. new text end deleted text begin (a)deleted text end new text begin (g) new text end MINNCOR shall use revenue contracts or purchase orders on forms approved by the Department of Administration whenever it allows private businesses to use inmate labor. MINNCOR shall determine whether to use a revenue contract or a purchase order according to criteria that the Department of Corrections has approved having taken into account the recommendations of the legislative auditor contained in its 2009 report on MINNCOR. deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (h)new text end MINNCOR shall develop a uniform method to report sales and expenditure data related to individual labor arrangements with private businesses. MINNCOR shall review the data annually to assess how the arrangements, both individually and collectively, affect MINNCOR achieving its goals of high inmate participation in industry and profitability. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 241.27, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Displacement of private sector workers; verification. new text end new text begin The commissioner of employment and economic development must verify that each contract MINNCOR enters will not result in the displacement of employed private sector workers in the geographic region in which MINNCOR facilities are located and the geographic region where the private business is located. new text end